Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Chapter 4 Chiropractors
63-4-117. Violations.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter commits a Class B misdemeanor.

Any person who has been enjoined by a court of competent jurisdiction from performing any acts or rendering any services that constitute the practice of chiropractic, who thereafter willfully violates the terms of the injunction by again performing such acts or rendering such services commits a Class E felony.

Acts 1923, ch. 9, § 14; Shan. Supp., § 3654a128; Code 1932, § 7022; impl. am. Acts 1947, ch. 9, § 13; C. Supp. 1950, § 7022; Acts 1976, ch. 781, § 13; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-419; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 81, 112.

Cross-References. Enjoining violations, § 63-1-121.

Penalties, § 63-1-123.

Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Penalty for Class E felony, § 40-35-111.

63-4-118. Immunity of reviewers from liability.

Any chiropractor who serves on any peer review committee or on any other committee, board, commission or other entity constituted by any statewide chiropractic association, local chiropractic society or governmental or quasi-governmental agency for the purpose of reviewing and evaluating chiropractic acts of other chiropractors or chiropractic auxiliary personnel, shall be immune from liability with respect to any action taken by that chiropractor in good faith and without malice as a member of such committee, board, commission or other entity.

Acts 1975, ch. 228, § 1; T.C.A., § 63-421.

Attorney General Opinions. Liability of chiropractors performing peer review, OAG 98-086, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 86 (4/14/98).

63-4-119. X-ray operators.

The board shall adopt rules and regulations that shall establish minimum educational standards and criteria for persons operating X-ray equipment for diagnostic purposes in chiropractic physicians' offices.

These regulations may include, but are not limited to, provisions for grandfathering, waiver, reciprocity, renewal, continuing education, fees, examination and hardship cases.

No person shall perform X-ray procedures in a chiropractic physician's office who does not meet these standards and who has not received a certificate of proficiency from the board.

Acts 1982, ch. 887, § 3; 1983, ch. 205, § 4.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

63-4-120. Externship certificates.

The board may issue an externship certificate to practice chiropractic, to be used only under supervision of a licensed chiropractor, upon payment of a fee as set by the board, to a chiropractor who meets all qualifications and requirements for licensure pursuant to this chapter and who has applied to take the examinations as provided in § 63-4-110.

Externs will be allowed to perform all diagnostic tests and therapeutic interventions as allowed providers licensed by this chapter.

Externship is to last no longer than three hundred sixty-five (365) days from date of certificate issuance. Applicants who provide proof of illness or hardship that hindered their ability to comply with § 63-4-110 may, at the board's discretion, be allowed a second year of externship.

The board may revoke an extern's certificate for violation of any portion of this chapter for failure to maintain proper supervision. “Supervision” is defined as direct oversight by a Tennessee licensed chiropractor. The supervisor shall be on the facility premises while the extern is conducting patient care.

The board reserves the right to adopt any rules and regulations as the board may deem appropriate for externs and the administration of externship program.

One hundred dollars ($100) shall be the administrative fee for applying to and participating in the externship program for each year of externship.

Acts 1983, ch. 205, § 6; 1989, ch. 523, § 6; 2000, ch. 618, § 7.

63-4-121. Chiropractic preceptor program.

The board will allow the chiropractic preceptor program (CPP) to function in the state so long as the preceptor and the intern meet the qualifications as specified by the chiropractic preceptor program advisory committee, or its equivalent; and provided, all guidelines of the committee are followed.

The board reserves the right to adopt any rules and regulations as the board may deem appropriate for the administration of this program.

Acts 1983, ch. 205, § 5.

63-4-122. Advertising.

The board shall adopt rules and regulations to regulate the nature, manner, content and extent of advertising by practitioners who are under the jurisdiction of such board.

Any licensed chiropractor who advertises or announces to the public that the licensed chiropractor is a certified acupuncturist shall be deemed to have engaged in false, misleading or deceptive advertising.

Acts 1984, ch. 546, § 1; 2006, ch. 775, § 3.

Cross-Reference. Advertising, § 63-1-145.

63-4-123. Minimum educational standards and criteria.

The board shall adopt rules that establish minimum educational standards and criteria for chiropractic therapy assistants performing physical agent modalities, physical treatment, and clinical services that are within the scope of practice of a chiropractic physician and, under the supervision of a chiropractic physician, either in the office of the chiropractic physician or in the presence of the chiropractic physician at another location.

These regulations shall include, but not be limited to, provisions for grandfathering, waiver, reciprocity, renewal, continuing education, fees, examination and hardship cases.

No person shall perform therapeutic procedures in a chiropractic physician's office who does not meet these standards and who has not received a certificate of proficiency from the board.

Acts 1999, ch. 306, § 1; 2017, ch. 455, § 7.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment rewrote (a)(1) which read: “(a)(1) The board shall adopt rules and regulations that shall establish minimum educational standards and criteria for persons performing physical agent modalities and physical treatment in a chiropractic physician's office.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 455, § 8. July 1, 2017.

63-4-124. Special volunteer license for practice in free health clinic — Exemption from fees — Renewal.

A chiropractor licensed pursuant to this chapter under a special volunteer license who is a medical practitioner, as defined by § 63-1-201, engaged in practice at a free health clinic shall not be subject to license fees under this chapter. The board of chiropractic examiners may issue a special volunteer license, as such license is defined in § 63-1-201, to qualified applicants without fee or charge. Such license shall be for a period of two (2) years and may be renewed on a biennial basis.

Acts 2004, ch. 579, § 6.